District of Columbia statutes.
21-592

Return to hospital of an escaped mentally ill person.

When a person has been ordered confined in a hospital or institution for the mentally ill pursuant to this chapter and has left such hospital or institution without authorization or has failed to return as directed, the court which ordered confinement shall, upon the request of the administrator of such hospital or institution, order the return of such person to such hospital or institution.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(c)(7)(A)

Cross References

Fugitives from welfare institutions, reward for apprehension, see § 24-201.27.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-592.
1973 Ed., § 21-592.